apertium-pl-sk.sk.dix
    <pardef n="l/aba__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>áb</l>
          <r>aba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e><i>ab</i><par n="Feminine_žena"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Feminine_ulica">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ou</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iam</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iach</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ul/ica__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íc</l>
          <r>ica<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e><i>ic</i><par n="Feminine_ulica"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Feminine_idea">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ou</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ám</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ách</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ide/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e><i></i><par n="Feminine_idea"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aukc/ia__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ia</l>
          <r>ia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r>ia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ii</l>
          <r>ia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iu</l>
          <r>ia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ii</l>
          <r>ia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iou</l>
          <r>ia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r>ia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ií</l>
          <r>ia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iám</l>
          <r>ia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r>ia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iách</l>
          <r>ia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iami</l>
          <r>ia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="krv__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ou</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Gamb/ia__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ia</l>
          <r>ia<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r>ia<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ii</l>
          <r>ia<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iu</l>
          <r>ia<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ii</l>
          <r>ia<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iou</l>
          <r>ia<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Bratislav/a__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ou</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ulica"><i>ul</i><par n="ul/ica__n"/></e>
    <e lm="akomodácia"><i>akomodác</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aprobácia"><i>aprobác</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="benevolencia"><i>benevolenc</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="deklinácia"><i>deklinác</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="determinácia"><i>determinác</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dištancia"><i>dištanc</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="epilácia"><i>epilác</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fascinácia"><i>fascinác</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="granulácia"><i>granulác</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="inaugurácia"><i>inaugurác</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="inštitúcia"><i>inštitúc</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iterácia"><i>iterác</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kolekcia"><i>kolekc</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="konsekvencia"><i>konsekvenc</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="korupcia"><i>korupc</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="meditácia"><i>meditác</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="operácia"><i>operác</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="popularizácia"><i>popularizác</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="radiácia"><i>radiác</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="relácia"><i>relác</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sankcia"><i>sankc</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="subordinácia"><i>subordinác</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="valorizácia"><i>valorizác</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anglofília"><i>anglofíl</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="daktyloskopia"><i>daktyloskop</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="energia"><i>energ</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fotochémia"><i>fotochém</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hydrobiológia"><i>hydrobiológ</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Bratislava"><i>Bratislav</i><par n="Bratislav/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Astúria"><i>Astúr</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Asýria"><i>Asýr</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Austrália"><i>Austrál</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ázia"><i>Áz</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Bolívia"><i>Bolív</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Dalmácia"><i>Dalmác</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Etiópia"><i>Etióp</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Eurázia"><i>Euráz</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Fenícia"><i>Feníc</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Filadelfia"><i>Filadelf</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Florencia"><i>Florenc</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Galícia"><i>Galíc</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Gambia"><i>Gamb</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Gdynia"><i>Gdyn</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Indonézia"><i>Indonéz</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="irónia"><i>irón</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kontraindikácia"><i>kontraindikác</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ornitológia"><i>ornitológ</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stereometria"><i>stereometr</i><par n="aukc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Juhoslávia"><i>Juhosláv</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Kastília"><i>Kastíl</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Kolumbia"><i>Kolumb</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Lesia"><i>Les</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Libéria"><i>Libér</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Mezopotámia"><i>Mezopotám</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Mikronézia"><i>Mikronéz</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Namíbia"><i>Namíb</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Oceánia"><i>Oceán</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Olympia"><i>Olymp</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Pennsylvánia"><i>Pennsylván</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Perugia"><i>Perug</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Perzia"><i>Perz</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Polynézia"><i>Polynéz</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Sicília"><i>Sicíl</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Sýria"><i>Sýr</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Tanzánia"><i>Tanzán</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Zambia"><i>Zamb</i><par n="Gamb/ia__np"/></e>
